Utah statutes.
16-4-310.   Error or omission in proceedings -- Effect.

(1)  No assessment is invalidated by:

(a)  a failure to serve, mail, or publish the notice of sale;

(b)  the omission of any information required to be contained in the notice; or

(c)  the nonperformance of any act otherwise required to be performed in connection with the sale of shares to enforce payment of an assessment.

(2)  No sale is valid unless proper notice is given and any material acts of nonperformance are corrected.

